Utah statutes.
20A-3-405.   Registration of military voters and overseas citizen voters.

(1) (a) (i)  Any military voter who is a legal resident of Utah but is stationed outside Utah and who is not otherwise registered to vote in Utah and any overseas citizen voter who is a legal resident of Utah but who is outside the territorial limits of the United States and who is not otherwise registered to vote in Utah may register in the manner provided by this section.

(ii)  That registration entitles him to vote in Utah elections as provided for in this part.

(b)  The county clerk shall cause a registration and voting certificate to be printed on the back of the ballot envelope in substantially the following form:

"REGISTRATION AND VOTING CERTIFICATE

I ____ (Print Name), place of birth ____, date of birth ____, solemnly swear (or affirm) that I am now a citizen of the United States and am at least 18 years old or will be 18 years old on the ____ (Date of election to be inserted) that I am a legal resident of ____ County, residing at ____ (Street and Number if any or rural route number) in the city or town of ____, state of Utah; that I am: (check appropriate blank)

_____In the armed forces of the United States;

_____In the merchant marine of the United States;

_____In the American Red Cross, in the Society of Friends, in the United States service organizations, attached to and serving with the armed forces of the United States;

_____A citizen of the United States residing outside the territorial limits of the United States;

_____A spouse or dependent of a person who meets the requirements of the above; that I have never been convicted of treason or crime against the elective franchise or other high crime causing a loss of my franchise without thereafter being restored to my civil rights; and that I expect to be absent from the above-named county on the date of the election.

____________________________________

Signature of voter

Identification Number__________________

(To be signed when voter is physically unable to see or write.)

_____________________________________________________________________________.

Signature of additional witness who is a commissioned, noncommissioned, or petty officer not below the rank of sergeant (or its equivalent) or other person authorized to administer oaths, who does swear that at the request of ____ (the voter), he assisted him in voting because the voter was on account of physical disability unable to see or write.  At the voter's direction he did read to him the registration and voting certificate and filled in the blanks and marked the ballot as the voter directed and signed his name at his request in the presence of both attesting officers.

This ballot may be voted even though an official federal ballot has already been voted, and if received by the proper election officials in time to be counted under the provisions of law, will be counted in lieu of the federal ballot."

(2) (a)  Any overseas citizen voter whose overseas service was terminated by discharge from the armed forces, by separation from the merchant marine, or by termination of service or employment outside the territorial limits of the United States too late to enable that voter to register to vote as required by this title may register to vote by filing an affidavit establishing his eligibility with the county clerk of his county of residence by noon on the day before the election.

(b)  After receiving and verifying the affidavit, the county clerk shall give the person a regular absentee ballot to vote.

